Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2019
Mistake in charging offense; jury; discharge prior to verdict.

When a jury has been impaneled in a case contemplated by section 29-2018, such jury may be discharged without prejudice to the prosecution.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 481, p. 829;

R.S.1913, § 9122;

C.S.1922, § 10147;

C.S.1929, § 29-2019;

R.S.1943, § 29-2019.